Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 2

Bonds

18-2-201. Official bond.

Every clerk of a court except the clerk of the supreme court and chief deputy clerks of the supreme court, before entering upon the duties of the clerk's office, shall enter into an official bond, which shall be prepared in accordance with title 8, chapter 19, to the satisfaction of the clerk's court, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in counties with a population of less than fifteen thousand (15,000) and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in counties with a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more, according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or in a greater sum as the court may determine, payable to the state, and conditioned for the safekeeping of the records and for the faithful discharge of the duties of the clerk's office.

The clerk of the supreme court and chief deputy clerks of the supreme court shall be included within the blanket surety bond required by § 4-4-108.

Unless otherwise clearly indicated by the context in which it is used, “clerk of a court” or “clerk,” as used in this part, includes “county clerk.”

Code 1858, § 326 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, §§ 2, 50); Shan., § 402; Code 1932, § 652; Acts 1977, ch. 270, § 16; 1980, ch. 887, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-208; Acts 1982, ch. 662, § 1; 1993, ch. 70, §§ 6, 7; 1998, ch. 677, § 14; 2013, ch. 315, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in counties with a population of less than fifteen thousand (15,000) and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in counties with a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more, according to the 2010 federal census” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in counties with population of less than fifteen thousand (15,000) and fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in counties with population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31. April 29, 2013.

Cross-References. Condition that fees, etc., will be accounted for, §8-22-102.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 632.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 5, 14; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 127; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 9.

Cited: Longmire v. Fain, 89 Tenn. 393, 18 S.W. 70, 1890 Tenn. LEXIS 61 (1890); Johnson v. Brice, 112 Tenn. 59, 83 S.W. 791, 1903 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (1904).

18-2-202. Commissioner and receiver bond.

The several courts may also require their clerks to give bond, in accordance with §18-2-205, in such sum as the court deems sufficient to cover property or funds that may at any time come to the hands of the clerks as special commissioners or receivers, by appointment of the court or any judge of the court.

Code 1858, § 328 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 150, § 2); Shan., § 404; Code 1932, § 654; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-210; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 15.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 632.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 127.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

18-2-203. Failure to give commissioner and receiver bond.

The failure of the clerk to execute the special bond provided for in §18-2-202 shall not subject the clerk to any penalty, but the court may confide the particular business to such other person as will give the required security, and, in the absence of the special bond, the clerk and the clerk's sureties will be liable, on the regular official bond, for all property or money with which the clerk may be properly chargeable as special commissioner or receiver.

Code 1858, § 329; Shan., § 405; Code 1932, § 655; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-211.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 127; 21 Tenn. Juris., Reference and Commissioners, § 19.

18-2-204. Special bonds.

The court may also require special bonds to meet particular exigencies, and in a suitable penalty, whenever, in its judgment, the interest of suitors render it necessary, subject to §18-2-203.

Code 1858, § 330; Shan., § 406; Code 1932, § 656; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-212.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

18-2-205. Entry and filing of bonds.

The bonds required in §§18-2-201 —18-2-204, after being acknowledged before, approved and certified by the court, shall be entered upon the minutes within thirty (30) days, and shall then be recorded in the office of the county register of deeds and transmitted to the office of the county clerk for safekeeping.

Code 1858, § 331 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, §§ 2, 50); Shan., § 407; Code 1932, § 657; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 51; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-213; Acts 1998, ch. 677, § 16; 2013, ch. 315, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to the renewal or obtaining an official bond for any bonding after April 29, 2013.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “office of the county clerk” for “comptroller of the treasury” near the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 315, § 31. April 29, 2013.

18-2-206. Scope of liability on bonds.

The official bonds of clerks, executed under this code, are obligatory on the principal and sureties for every wrongful act or failure of duty in the clerk's official capacity, whether embraced in the condition of the bond or not, or growing out of a law passed subsequently to its execution.

Code 1858, § 335 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 150, § 1); Shan., § 411; Code 1932, § 661; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-214.

Cross-References. Bonds of public officers, law applicable, §§8-19-302 —8-19-304,8-19-306.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

18-2-207. Chancellors to examine bonds.

It is the duty of the chancellors, on the first day of each term of their respective courts, to examine the bonds of the respective clerks and masters of those courts, and to ascertain whether they are in conformity to law and whether the sureties on the bonds are good and solvent and worth the penalties of the bonds respectively.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 412; Code 1932, § 662; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-215.

Cross-References. Examination of clerks' bonds, §8-19-201.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 617.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

18-2-208. Examination of witnesses and records.

The chancellors, whenever necessary to arrive at a correct knowledge of the respective bonds and their sufficiency, shall summon witnesses and examine them on oath, and shall examine all records in any of the county or state offices, and all records and papers in the offices of the clerks and masters.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 2; Shan., § 413; Code 1932, § 663; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-216.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

18-2-209. Orders to correct deficiencies in bond.

Whenever any chancellor in any manner determines that the bonds of any clerk and master of any court within the chancellor's judicial district are, from any cause, insufficient, the chancellor shall forthwith make a record of the fact on the minutes of the court, and order the clerk and master, within thirty (30) days from that date, to make the clerk and master's bonds sufficient by executing new bonds or giving additional security, and complying with any order of the chancellor in regard to the bonds.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 3; Shan., § 414; mod. Code 1932, § 664; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-217.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 14.

18-2-210. Other courts and county legislative bodies also to examine bonds.

Sections 18-2-207 — 18-2-209 shall apply also to the clerks of the other courts of this state, and it shall be the duty of the judges of the supreme, circuit, criminal and special courts, at each term of those courts, respectively, and of the county legislative bodies at every quarterly meeting, to inquire into the bonds of their respective clerks, as the chancellors are required to do; and all the powers for this purpose vested in the chancellors are vested in the judges of the other courts and the county legislative body.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 4; Shan., § 415; mod. Code 1932, § 665; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 12, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-218.

Cross-References. Examination of clerks' bonds by judges, §8-19-201.

18-2-211. Time for examination of bonds.

Nothing in §§18-2-207 —18-2-210 is to be construed to prevent the examination of bonds on any other than the first day of any term or meeting, but the examination shall be made at each term and quarterly meeting, as respectively provided, and the examination may be continued from day to day until a satisfactory conclusion is reached.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 5; Shan., § 416; mod. Code 1932, § 666; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 12, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-219.

18-2-212. Grand jury examination of bonds.

The grand jury in each county shall inquire into the correctness and sufficiency of the bonds of all the clerks within the county, including the clerk and master of the chancery court, and, for this purpose, they may send for witnesses and examine all necessary records and papers. Should they find any bond of any of the clerks incorrect in form or insufficient in amount, or in the quality of the security on the bonds, it is their duty to return the fact to the court to which the clerk belongs, and thereupon it shall be the duty of the court, without delay, to make an order upon the clerk to execute within thirty (30) days, in lieu of such bond, a new bond, or give additional satisfactory security.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 6; Shan., § 417; mod. Code 1932, § 667; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-220.

18-2-213. Removal for failure to execute new bond.

Should any clerk or clerk and master fail to comply with the order of the clerk or clerk and master's court, it shall be the imperative duty of the court to remove the clerk or clerk and master, and appoint some other person in the clerk's or clerk and master's place.

If a clerk elected by the people is removed, the appointment shall be to fill the unexpired term, but if a clerk and master, or other clerk whose appointment is by law vested in the court is removed, the appointment shall be for a full term of office.

Ample power and authority are vested in the courts to take bond and security to carry into execution this section.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 7; Shan., § 418; mod. Code 1932, § 668; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-221.

Cross-References. Term of office of clerk and master, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 13; §§18-4-101,18-5-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 617.

Cited: In re Appointment of Clerk & Master, 670 S.W.2d 215, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 786 (Tenn. 1984).

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
8.